Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible agency” means an agency that has contracted with the  United States De-
partment of State under 8 U.S.C. 1522(c) to provide initial resettlement and case management
services to refugees.
(b) “Refugee” means an individual who is not a  United States citizen, who has been in
the United States for 60 months or less and who is any of the following:
(A) A refugee admitted under 8 U.S.C. 1157.
(B) An asylee admitted under 8 U.S.C. 1158.
(C) A Cuban or Haitian entrant as defined in 45 C.F.R. 401.2.
(D) A parolee admitted under 8 U.S.C. 1182(d)(5).
(E) An Amerasian immigrant lawfully admitted to the  United States who is described in
8 U.S.C. 1612(a)(2)(A)(v).
(F) A victim of a severe form of trafficking  in persons and the victim’s family members
who are eligible for benefits and services from federal and state programs  under 22
U.S.C. 7105(b)(1)(A).
(G) An Iraqi or an Afghan citizen who is a principal alien provided  with the status of
special immigrant by the United States Department of Homeland Security under:
(i) Section 1059(a) of  the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2006, P.L.
109-163, 119 Stat. 3444;
Enrolled House Bill 2508 (HB 2508-B) Page 1
(ii) Section 1244(b) of  the Refugee Crisis in Iraq Act of 2007, P.L. 110-181, 122 Stat. 397;
or
(iii) Section 602(b) of the Afghan Allies Protection Act of 2009, P.L. 111-8, 123 Stat. 807.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall award grants  to eligible agencies to provide
the following services to refugees residing in this state, for up to 24 months:
(a) Assisting refugees with department programs by:
(A) Referring  refugees to the department within three days of the refugee’s arrival in
this state;
(B) Completing applications for assistance;
(C) Transporting the refugee to the initial appointments with the department;
(D) Providing to the  department all necessary eligibility information known to the eligible
agency; and
(E) Coordinating services of the department with other social service agencies.
(b) Assisting refugees with:
(A) Navigating the health care and mental health systems, including providing  assistance
in applying for medical assistance;
(B) Accessing housing assistance and finding stable housing;
(C) Setting up utilities and paying utility bills;
(D) Issues with landlords;
(E) Navigating legal or criminal issues including services for victims of crime;
(F) Accessing in-home services including  parenting assistance, English as a second lan-
guage instruction, medical and psychosocial support; and
(G) Navigating the culture of the United States.
(c) Providing transportation to appointments.
(d) Training refugees on using public transportation.
(e) Providing immigration assistance and referrals.
(f) Advocating  on behalf of refugees regarding domestic violence, federal laws and hate
crimes.
(g) Providing refugees  with interpretation services and assistance with access to lan-
guage services.
(h) Providing referrals for refugees to culturally specific support groups and services,
including religious organizations.
(i) Pairing refugees with volunteers for English as a  second language training and ongo-
ing language support.
(j) Providing support to refugees in budgeting and achieving financial literacy.
(k) Identifying refugees’ employment skills and providing referrals to employment skills
training and other job support services.
(L) Problem solving with refugees and assisting refugees with life skills development.
(m) Ensuring that refugees have access to psychosocial  support and emotional wellness
education.
(n) Coordinating medical services for refugees including referring  to and coordinating
with agencies that determine eligibility for disability benefits.
(o) Providing family preservation services,  legal services and social service support for
domestic violence and child welfare issues.
(p) Assisting newly arrived  refugee children in accessing services to strengthen the
children’s academic performance and successful integration into the community.
(q) Other services necessary to assist refugees in accessing  programs administered by
the department.
SECTION 2.
(1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000:
Enrolled House Bill 2508 (HB 2508-B) Page 2
(a) Which shall be expended to award grants to eligible agencies, as  defined in section 1
of this 2019 Act, to supplement the funding received by eligible agencies from the United
States Department of  State under 8 U.S.C. 1522 to provide services as described in section 1
of this 2019 Act; and
(b) Of which up to $200,000 shall be  granted to an employment service provider described
in subsection (2) of this section to provide coordination of employment services.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall select an  employment service provider to
receive the moneys described  in subsection (1)(b) of this section that is an established cul-
turally responsive organization and provides employment and  workforce development ser-
vices to refugees, as defined in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House June 25, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2508 (HB 2508-B) Page 3